Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2051.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Designation by the United States national park service
of any national heritage area or national historic trail, pursuant to 54
U.S.C. 300101 et seq., that extends beyond federal land within the state of
Kansas shall require the approval of the legislature of the state of Kansas
through the adoption of a concurrent resolution.
(b) State funds shall not be expended or transferred from state
agencies to match federal moneys for national heritage areas, national
historic trails or any similar or successor designated areas without the
approval of the legislature of the state of Kansas through the adoption of a
concurrent resolution.
(c) State lands, water, property or facilities shall not be included in
any designated national heritage area, national historic trail or any similar
or successor designated areas without the approval of the legislature of the
state of Kansas through the adoption of a concurrent resolution.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.